Indiana, session 2026, HB1024.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 21-13-1-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.232-2025,
SECTION 20, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. "Fund":
(1) for purposes of IC 21-13-2, refers to the William A. Crawford
minority teacher scholarship fund established by IC 21-13-2-1;
(2) for purposes of IC 21-13-4, refers to the National Guard
tuition supplement program fund established by IC 21-13-4-1;
(3) for purposes of IC 21-13-5, refers to the National Guard
scholarship extension fund established by IC 21-13-5-1;
(4) for purposes of IC 21-13-6, refers to the primary care
physician loan forgiveness fund established by IC 21-13-6-3;
(5) for purposes of IC 21-13-6.5, refers to the medical residency
education fund established by IC 21-13-6.5-1; and
(6) for purposes of IC 21-13-12, refers to the county deputy
prosecuting attorney and public defender scholarship fund
established by IC 21-13-12-6; and
(7) for purposes of IC 21-13-13, refers to the veterinary
HB 1024—LS 6065/DI 148


medicine student loan repayment program fund established
by IC 21-13-13-3.
SECTION 2. IC 21-13-13 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 13. Veterinary Medicine Student Loan Repayment
Program
Sec. 1. For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions
apply:
(1) "Fund" refers to the veterinary medicine student loan
repayment program fund established by section 3 of this
chapter.
(2) "Program" refers to the veterinary medicine student loan
repayment program established by section 2 of this chapter.
Sec. 2. (a) The veterinary medicine student loan repayment
program is established.
(b) The Indiana state board of animal health shall administer
the program.
Sec. 3. (a) The veterinary medicine student loan repayment
program fund is established to provide funds to repay outstanding
student loans of:
(1) veterinarians; or
(2) veterinary technicians;
who meet the requirements established by the Indiana state board
of animal health.
(b) The Indiana state board of animal health shall administer
the fund.
(c) The fund consists of the following:
(1) Appropriations from the general assembly.
(2) Grants, including federal grants.
(3) Gifts or donations to the Indiana state board of animal
health to achieve the purposes of the fund.
(4) Interest accrued under subsection (d).
(d) The treasurer of state shall invest the money in the fund not
currently needed to meet the obligations of the fund in the same
manner as other public funds may be invested. Interest that
accrues from investments under this subsection must be deposited
in the fund.
(e) Money in the fund at the end of a state fiscal year does not
revert to the state general fund.
(f) The expenses of administering the fund may be paid from
money in the fund but must not exceed the amounts deposited in
HB 1024—LS 6065/DI 148


the fund under subsection (c)(1), (c)(2), and (c)(4).
(g) A person that provides money to the fund under subsection
(c)(3) may direct that the money be used for loan repayments for
a specific:
(1) veterinarian practice type; or
(2) geographic area of Indiana.
Sec. 4. The Indiana state board of animal health shall do the
following:
(1) Establish requirements for the program.
(2) Identify individuals who qualify for the program.
(3) Determine the amount and duration of the student loan
repayment award that an eligible individual receives.
(4) Identify areas of need.
Sec. 5. (a) To be eligible to receive a student loan repayment
award, an individual must meet the following requirements:
(1) Apply on a form prescribed by the Indiana state board of
animal health.
(2) Be a:
(A) licensed, accredited veterinarian; or
(B) registered veterinarian technician;
who is licensed or registered under IC 25-38.1-3.
(3) Be a resident of Indiana and a citizen of the United States.
(4) Have an outstanding student loan balance from loans
secured during professional training at an accredited:
(A) college of veterinary medicine; or
(B) veterinary technician program.
(5) Agree to practice full time in the veterinary profession and
provide essential services in Indiana for a specific number of
years as determined by the Indiana state board of animal
health. When determining essential services in Indiana, the
Indiana state board of animal health shall consider the
following factors:
(A) Rural or other geographic areas of the state that are
currently underserved.
(B) Food animal or other areas of veterinary practice that
are either:
(i) currently experiencing; or
(ii) projected to experience;
a shortage of veterinary practitioners or veterinary
technicians.
(C) Any other factor that:
(i) furthers the protection of human and animal health;
HB 1024—LS 6065/DI 148


and
(ii) ensures the efficient and principled delivery of
veterinary medical services in Indiana.
(b) The Indiana state board of animal health shall:
(1) determine the amount of a student loan repayment award
that an eligible individual receives under this chapter; and
(2) establish the process for an eligible individual to receive
multi-year awards under this chapter.
Sec. 6. The Indiana state board of animal health shall transfer
student loan repayment awards under this chapter directly to the
holder of the eligible individual's outstanding student loans.
Sec. 7. The Indiana state board of animal health may make
student loan repayment awards to an eligible individual until the
balance of the eligible individual's student loans is paid in full.
Sec. 8. (a) The Indiana state board of animal health shall
prepare a report that includes the following:
(1) The receipt, disbursement, and uses of money from the
fund.
(2) The number of applications submitted for student loan
repayment under the program.
(3) The number and amount of student loan repayment
awards that have been provided.
(4) An evaluation of the short term and long term impact of
the program on Indiana's delivery of veterinary medical
services.
(5) Any other information collected concerning the fund,
program, or student loan repayments awarded under this
chapter.
(b) Not later than July 1, 2027, and not later than July 1 every
two (2) years thereafter, the Indiana state board of animal health
shall submit the report described in subsection (a) to the following:
(1) The governor.
(2) The general assembly in an electronic format under
IC 5-14-6.
Sec. 9. The Indiana state board of animal health shall adopt
rules under IC 4-22-2 to:
(1) establish eligibility requirements to receive student loan
repayment awards under the program; and
(2) otherwise administer the program.
HB 1024—LS 6065/DI 148


COMMITTEE REPORT
Mr. Speaker: Your Committee on Agriculture and Rural
Development, to which was referred House Bill 1024, has had the same
under consideration and begs leave to report the same back to the
House with the recommendation that said bill do pass.
(Reference is to HB 1024 as introduced.)
AYLESWORTH
Committee Vote: Yeas 10, Nays 0
HB 1024—LS 6065/DI 148